Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 26. Channel Maintenance Act

§ 49-26-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Channel Maintenance Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 604, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-26-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds that channel maintenance is necessary to preserve and enhance the economic stability and recreational potential of the coastal region. The Legislature declares it to be a governmental responsibility to provide for proper channel maintenance. The Legislature further declares that channel maintenance projects are in the public interest. Those projects should be funded to promote the use of cost-efficient strategies, encourage coordination among federal, state and local governments and the private sector, provide for long-term solutions and minimize the impact of the environment to the extent possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 604, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-26-5.
Duties and Department of Marine Resources.

The Department of Marine Resources, referred to in this chapter as “department,” shall serve as the primary state agency with regard to coordinating channel maintenance activities along the Mississippi Gulf Coast.

The department shall develop a comprehensive long-range management plan for channel maintenance activities. The plan shall at a minimum:

Identify areas in which channels are in need of maintenance;

Assess the short-term and long-term economic costs and benefits of the state’s channels;

Promote channel sand bypassing to replicate the natural flow of sand; and

Recommend channel maintenance projects to the Legislature for funding which ensures the geographic coordination and sequencing of prioritized projects.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 604, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-26-7.
Identification and pursuit of federal funding alternatives.

The department shall identify federal funding mechanisms which could be used to fund projects regarding channel maintenance. The department shall coordinate with local governments and other interest groups to maximize the eligibility of projects for funding and to assist in the preparation of appropriate financial assistance documentation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 604, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.